Nevada, session 83, AB263.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of county commissioners of each county whose
population is 700,000 or more shall notify the Department of
Transportation before conducting a clean-up of an encampment
of homeless persons immediately adjacent to a right-of-way that is
controlled by the Department of Transportation.
2. As used in this section, “right-of-way” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 408.55014.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. Chapter 408 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department may:
(a) Consult with a homeless outreach team; and
(b) Participate in the clean-up of an encampment of homeless
persons in a right-of-way, as defined in NRS 408.55014.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. As used in this section, “homeless outreach team” means a
homeless outreach team established or designated by a board of
county commissioners or its designee for the purposes of providing
outreach and clean-ups related to homeless persons.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)